Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [136F.51] DESIGNATION OF FLAGSHIP INSTITUTION. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2027, the board must designate a state university as a flagship institution. A flagship institution must: new text end new text begin (1) have a clearly defined mission and strategic plan that align with faculty hiring and retention and student enrollment; new text end new text begin (2) demonstrate an exceptional capacity to promote the state's economic development and intellectual advancement; new text end new text begin (3) be a high-enrollment campus that evidences a continual pattern of growth; new text end new text begin (4) be granted autonomy, as requested by the institution, from systemwide mandates and operating restrictions; and new text end new text begin (5) receive priority in capital improvement requests and decisions. new text end